Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. CLOUD AREA FAMILY YMCA OUTDOOR WATERPARK.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Cloud to design, construct, and equip an outdoor waterpark attached to the existing St. Cloud Area Family YMCA facility. This project will help to fulfill a long-time community desire for an outdoor waterpark attraction that engages all ages, creates multigenerational connections and spaces to enrich relationships and foster community, and provides leadership development for youth and young adults with job and volunteer opportunities. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end